Hawaii statutes.
[§251-7] Filing of returns. All
monthly, quarterly, semiannual, and annual returns shall be transmitted to the
office of the taxation district in which the person's place of business is
situated or to the office of the first taxation district in Honolulu. [L 1991,
c 263, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next